California statutes. Insurance Code
(4) “Triage” or “screening” means the assessment of an insured’s health concerns and symptoms via communication with a physician, registered nurse, or other qualified health professional acting within their scope of practice and who is trained to screen or triage an insured who may need care for the purpose of determining the urgency of the insured’s need for care.

(5) “Triage or screening waiting time” means the time waiting to speak by telephone with a
 physician, registered nurse, or other qualified health professional acting within their scope of practice and who is trained to screen or triage an insured who may need care.

(6) “Urgent care” means health care for a condition which requires prompt attention, consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 10123.135.

(f) (1) The department may issue guidance to insurers regarding annual timely access and network reporting methodologies. The development and adoption of these methodologies shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) until December 31, 2025.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may take compliance or disciplinary action, including imposition of administrative penalties, on the basis of noncompliance with any of the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, timeframes for appointments and followup appointments.

(3) The department may review and adopt standards, in addition to those specified in this article, concerning the availability of primary care physicians, specialty physicians, hospital care, and other health care, so that consumers have timely access to care. In so doing, the department shall consider the nature of physician practices, including individual and group practices, as well as the nature of the network. The department shall also consider various circumstances affecting the delivery of care, including urgent care, care provided
 on the same day, and requests for specific providers. If the department finds that insurers and health care providers have difficulty meeting these standards, the department may make recommendations to the Assembly Committee on Health and the Senate Committee on Health. The development and adoption of standards under this paragraph shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act until December 31, 2028. The department shall consult with stakeholders in developing the standards and methodologies described in this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the department from developing additional standards to improve timely access to care and network adequacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 601, Sec. 3.   (SB 225)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.55.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), every disability insurer covering hospital, medical, and surgical expenses on a group basis that contracts with providers for alternative rates pursuant to Section 10133 and limits payments under those policies to services secured by insureds and subscribers from providers charging alternative rates pursuant to these contracts, shall file with the Department of Insurance, a written policy describing how the insurer shall facilitate the continuity of care for new insureds or enrollees receiving services during a current episode of care for an acute condition from a noncontracting provider. This written policy shall describe the process used to facilitate continuity of care,
 including the assumption of care by a contracting provider.

(2) On or before July 1, 2002, every disability insurer covering hospital, medical, and surgical expenses on a group basis that contracts with providers for alternative rates pursuant to Section 10133 and limits payments under those policies to services secured by insureds and subscribers from providers charging alternative rates pursuant to these contracts, shall file with the department a written policy describing how the insurer shall facilitate the continuity of care for new enrollees who have been receiving services for an acute, serious, or chronic mental health condition from a nonparticipating mental health provider when the enrollee’s employer has changed policies. Every written policy shall allow the new enrollee a reasonable transition period to continue his or her course of treatment with the nonparticipating mental health provider prior to transferring to another
 participating provider and shall include the provision of mental health services on a timely, appropriate, and medically necessary basis from the nonparticipating provider. The policy may provide that the length of the transition period take into account the severity of the enrollee’s condition and the amount of time reasonably necessary to effect a safe transfer on a case-by-case basis. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require the insurer to accept a nonparticipating mental health provider onto its panel for treatment of other enrollees. For purposes of the continuing treatment of the transferring enrollee, the insurer may require the nonparticipating mental health provider, as a condition of the right conferred under this section, to enter into the standard mental health provider contract.

(b) Notice of the policy and information regarding how enrollees may request a review under the policy shall be provided to all new
 enrollees, except those enrollees who are not eligible as described in subdivision (e). A copy of the written policy shall be provided to eligible enrollees upon request. The written policy required to be filed under subdivision (a) shall describe how requests to continue services with an existing noncontracting provider are reviewed by the insurer. The policy shall ensure that reasonable consideration is given to the potential clinical effect that a change of provider would have on the insured’s or subscriber’s treatment for the acute condition.

(c) An insurer may require any nonparticipating provider whose services are continued pursuant to the written policy to agree in writing to meet the same contractual terms and conditions that are imposed upon the insurer’s participating providers, including location within the service area, reimbursement methodologies, and rates of payment. If the insurer determines that a patient’s health care
 treatment should temporarily continue with the patient’s existing provider or nonparticipating mental health provider, the insurer shall not be liable for actions resulting solely from the negligence, malpractice, or other tortious or wrongful acts arising out of the provision of services by the existing provider or nonparticipating mental health provider.

(d) Nothing in this section shall require an insurer to cover services or provide benefits that are not otherwise covered under the terms and conditions of the policy contract.

(e) The written policy shall not apply to any insured or subscriber who is offered an out-of-network option, or who had the option to continue with his or her previous health benefits carrier or provider and instead voluntarily chose to change.

(f) This section shall not apply to insurer
 contracts that include out-of-network coverage under which the insured or subscriber is able to obtain services from the insured’s or subscriber’s existing provider or nonparticipating mental health provider.

(g) (1) For purposes of this section, “provider” refers to a person who is described in subdivision (f) of Section 900 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, “nonparticipating mental health provider” refers to a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, or licensed professional clinical counselor who is not part of the insurer’s contracted provider network.

(h) This section shall only apply to a group disability insurance policy if it provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical
 benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 36.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.56.

(a) (1) A health insurer that enters into a contract with a professional or institutional provider to provide services at alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 shall, at the request of an insured, arrange for the completion of covered services by a terminated provider, if the insured is undergoing a course of treatment for any of the following conditions:

(A) An acute condition. An acute condition is a medical condition that involves a sudden onset of symptoms due to an illness, injury, or other medical problem that requires prompt medical attention and that has a limited duration. Completion of covered services shall be provided for the duration
 of the acute condition.

(B) (i) A serious chronic condition. A serious chronic condition is a medical condition due to a disease, illness, or other medical problem or medical disorder that is serious in nature and that persists without full cure or worsens over an extended period of time or requires ongoing treatment to maintain remission or prevent deterioration. Completion of covered services shall be provided for a period of time necessary to complete a course of treatment and to arrange for a safe transfer to another provider, as determined by the health insurer in consultation with the insured and the terminated provider and consistent with good professional practice.

(ii) Completion of covered services under clause (i) shall not exceed 12 months from the contract termination date or 12 months from the effective date of coverage for a newly covered insured.

(C) (i) A pregnancy. A pregnancy is the three trimesters of pregnancy and the immediate postpartum period. Completion of covered services shall be provided for the duration of the pregnancy.

(ii) For purposes of an individual who presents written documentation of being diagnosed with a maternal mental health condition from the individual’s treating health care provider, completion of covered services for the maternal mental health condition shall
 not exceed 12 months from the diagnosis or from the end of pregnancy, whichever occurs later.

(D) A terminal illness. A terminal illness is an incurable or irreversible condition that has a high probability of causing death within one year or less. Completion of covered services shall be provided for the duration of a terminal illness, which may exceed 12 months from the contract termination date or 12 months from the effective date of coverage for a new insured.

(E) The care of a newborn child between birth and age 36 months. Completion of covered services under this paragraph shall not exceed
 12 months from the contract termination date or 12 months from the effective date of coverage for a newly covered insured.

(F) Performance of a surgery or other procedure that has been recommended and documented by the provider to occur within 180 days of the contract’s termination date or within 180 days of the effective date of coverage for a newly covered insured.

(2) The insurer may require the terminated provider whose services are continued beyond the contract termination date pursuant to this subdivision, to agree in writing to be subject to the same contractual terms and conditions that were imposed upon the provider prior to termination, including, but not limited to, credentialing, hospital privileging, utilization review, peer review, and quality assurance
 requirements. If the terminated provider does not agree to comply or does not comply with these contractual terms and conditions, the insurer is not required to continue the provider’s services beyond the contract termination date.

(3) Unless otherwise agreed upon between the terminated provider and the insurer or between the terminated provider and the provider group, the agreement shall be construed to require a rate and method of payment to the terminated provider, for the services rendered pursuant to this subdivision, that are the same as the rate and method of payment for the same services while under contract with the insurer and at the time of termination. The provider shall accept the reimbursement as payment in full and shall not bill the insured for any amount in excess of the reimbursement rate, with the exception of
 copayments and deductibles pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) Notice as to the process by which an insured may request completion of covered services pursuant to this section shall be
 provided in any insurer evidence of coverage and disclosure form issued after March 31, 2004. An insurer shall provide a written copy of this information to its contracting providers and provider groups. An insurer shall also provide a copy to its insureds upon request. Notice as to the availability of the right to request completion of covered services shall be part of, accompany, or be sent simultaneously with any termination of coverage notice sent in the circumstances described in subdivision (i).

(c) The payment of copayments, deductibles, or other cost-sharing components by the insured during the period of completion of covered services with a terminated provider pursuant to subdivision (a) or a nonparticipating provider pursuant to subdivision (i) shall be the same copayments, deductibles, or other cost-sharing
 components that would be paid by the insured when receiving care from a provider currently contracting with the insurer.

(d) If an insurer delegates the responsibility of complying with this section to its contracting entities, the insurer shall ensure that the requirements of this section are met.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Provider” means a person who is a licentiate as defined in Section 805 of the Business and Professions Code or a person licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Provider group” includes a medical group,
 independent
 practice association, or any other similar organization.

(3) “Nonparticipating provider” means a provider who is not contracted with the insured’s health insurer to provide services under the insured’s policy. A nonparticipating provider does not include a terminated provider.

(4) “Terminated provider” means a provider whose contract to provide services to insureds is terminated or not renewed by the insurer or one of the insurer’s contracting provider groups. A terminated provider is not a provider who voluntarily leaves the insurer or contracting provider group.

(5) “Maternal mental health condition” means a mental health condition that can impact a woman during pregnancy, peri or postpartum, or that arises during pregnancy, in the peri or postpartum period, up to one year after delivery.

(f) This section does not require an insurer or provider group to provide for the completion of covered services by a provider whose contract with the insurer or provider group has been terminated or not renewed for reasons relating to medical disciplinary cause or reason, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 805 of the Business and Professions Code, or fraud or other criminal activity.

(g) This section does not require an insurer to cover services or provide benefits
 that are not otherwise covered under the terms and conditions of the insurer contract.

(h) The provisions contained in this section are in addition to any other responsibilities of insurers to provide continuity of care pursuant to this chapter. This section does not preclude an insurer from providing continuity of care beyond the requirements of this section.

(i) (1) A health insurer shall, at the request of a newly covered insured under an individual insurance policy, arrange for the completion of covered services as set forth in this section by a nonparticipating provider for one of the conditions described in subdivision (a) if the newly covered insured meets both of the following:

(A) The
 newly covered insured’s prior coverage was terminated under subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 10273.6 or paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1365 of the Health and Safety Code, which includes circumstances when a health benefit plan is withdrawn from any portion of a market.

(B) At the time the insured’s coverage became effective, the newly covered insured was receiving services from that provider for one of the conditions described in subdivision (a).

(2) The completion of covered services required to be provided under this subdivision shall apply to services rendered to the newly covered insured on and after the effective date of their new coverage.

(3) (A) The insurer may require a
 nonparticipating provider whose services are continued pursuant to this subdivision for a newly covered insured to agree in writing to be subject to the same contractual terms and conditions that are imposed upon currently
 participating providers providing similar services who are practicing in the same or a similar geographic area as the nonparticipating provider, including, but not limited to, credentialing, hospital privileging, utilization review, peer review, and quality assurance requirements. If the nonparticipating provider does not agree to comply or does not comply with these contractual terms and conditions, the insurer is not required to continue the provider’s services.

(B) Unless otherwise agreed upon by the nonparticipating provider and the insurer, the services rendered pursuant to this subdivision shall be compensated at rates and methods of payment similar to those used by the insurer for currently participating providers providing similar services who are practicing in the same or a similar geographic area as the nonparticipating
 provider. Neither the insurer nor the provider group is required to continue the services of a nonparticipating provider if the provider does not accept the payment rates provided for in this paragraph. The provider who agrees to provide services pursuant to this subdivision shall accept the reimbursement as payment in full and shall not bill the insured for any amount in excess of the reimbursement rate, with the exception of copayments and deductibles pursuant to subdivision (c).

(C) A provider’s agreement to contractual terms and conditions and acceptance of payment rates to provide the completion of covered services to an insured pursuant to this subdivision shall not be construed as an agreement to contractual terms and conditions or acceptance of payment rates for any other insureds or for any services other than covered
 services pursuant to this subdivision, nor shall it be construed as agreement to any other contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 776, Sec. 2.   (AB 577)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the citizens of this state receive high-quality health care coverage in the most efficient and cost-effective manner possible. In furtherance of this intent, the Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest to promote various types of contracts between public or private payers of health care coverage, and institutional or professional providers of health care services. This intent has been demonstrated by the recent enactment of Chapters 328, 329, and 1594 of the Statutes of 1982 authorizing various types of contracts to be entered into between public or private payers of health care coverage, and institutional or professional providers of health care services. The Legislature further finds and declares that individual providers, whether institutional or professional and individual purchasers, have not proven to be efficient-sized bargaining units for these contracts, and that the formation of groups and combinations of institutional and professional providers and purchasing groups for the purpose of creating efficient-sized contracting units represents a meaningful addition to the health care marketplace. The Legislature further finds and declares that the public interest in ensuring that citizens of this state receive high-quality health care coverage in the most efficient and cost-effective manner possible is furthered by permitting negotiations for alternative rate contracts between purchasers and payers and both institutional and professional providers, or through a person or entity acting for, or on behalf of, a health insurer or an institutional or professional provider, pursuant to Sections 10133 and 11512. It is the intent of the Legislature, therefore, that the formation of groups and combinations of purchasers, payers, and institutional and professional providers of health care services for the purpose of creating efficient-sized contracting units be recognized as the creation of a new product within the health care marketplace, and be subject, therefore, only to those antitrust prohibitions applicable to the conduct of other presumptively legitimate enterprises.

This section does not change existing antitrust law as it relates to any agreement or arrangement to exclude from any of the above-described groups or combinations, any person who is lawfully qualified to perform the services to be performed by the members of the group or combination, where the ground for the exclusion is failure to possess the same license or certification as is possessed by the members of the group or combination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1592, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.64.

(a) A contract issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2015, by or on behalf of a health insurer and a provider or supplier shall not contain any provision that restricts the ability of the health insurer to furnish consumers or purchasers information concerning any of the following:

(1) The cost range of a procedure or a full course of treatment, including, but not limited to, facility, professional, and diagnostic services, prescription drugs, durable medical equipment, and other items and services related to the treatment.

(2) The quality of services performed by the provider or
 supplier.

(b) Any contractual provision inconsistent with this section shall be void and unenforceable.

(c) A health insurer shall provide the provider or supplier an advance opportunity of 30 days to review the methodology and data developed and compiled by the health insurer, and used pursuant to subdivision (a), before cost or quality information is provided to consumers or purchasers, including material revisions or additions of new information. At the time the health insurer provides a provider or supplier with the opportunity to review the methodology and data, it shall also notify the provider or supplier in writing of their opportunity to provide an Internet Web site link pursuant to
 subdivision (f).

(d) If the information proposed to be furnished to policyholders and insureds on the quality of services performed by a provider or supplier is data that the insurer has developed and compiled, the insurer shall utilize appropriate risk adjustment factors to account for different characteristics of the population, such as case mix, severity of patient’s condition, comorbidities, outlier episodes, and other factors to account for differences in the use of health care resources among providers and suppliers.

(e) Any Internet Web site owned or controlled by a health insurer, or operated by another person or entity under contract with or on behalf of a health insurer, that displays the information developed and compiled by the health insurer as referenced by
 this section shall prominently post the following statement:
“Individual health care facilities or providers may disagree with the methodology used to define the cost ranges, the cost data, or quality measures. Many factors may influence cost or quality, including, but not limited to, the cost of uninsured and charity care, the type and severity of procedures, the case mix of a facility, special services such as trauma centers, burn units, medical and other educational programs, research, transplant services, technology, payer mix, and other factors affecting individual health care facilities and providers.”
A health insurer and a provider or supplier shall not be precluded from mutually agreeing in writing to an alternative method of
 conveying this statement.

(f) If a provider or supplier chooses to provide an Internet Web site link where a response to the health insurer’s posting may be found, it shall do so in a timely manner in order to satisfy the requirements of this section. If a provider or supplier chooses to provide a response, an insurer shall post, in an easily identified manner, a prominent link to the provider’s or supplier’s Internet Web site where a response to the health insurer’s posting may be found. A health insurer and a provider or supplier shall not be precluded from mutually agreeing in writing to an alternative method to convey a provider’s or supplier’s response.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Consumers” means policyholders or insureds of the health insurer or beneficiaries of a self-funded health coverage arrangement administered by the health insurer or other persons entitled to access services through a network established by the health insurer.

(2) “Provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 10117.52.

(3) “Purchasers” means the sponsors of a self-funded health coverage arrangement administered by the health insurer.

(4) “Supplier” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 10117.52.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.641.

(a) A contract between a health insurer and a provider of health care services shall not contain any term that would result in termination or nonrenewal of the contract or otherwise penalize the provider, based solely on either of the following:

(1) A civil judgment issued in another state, a criminal conviction in another state, or another professional disciplinary action in another state, if the judgment, conviction, or professional disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive care that would be lawful if provided in this state.

(2) The manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.

(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate, with respect to the provision of, or contracts for, professional services, against a licensed provider solely on the basis of either of the following:

(1) A civil judgment issued in another state, a criminal conviction in another state, or another professional disciplinary action in another state if the judgment, conviction, or professional disciplinary action is based solely on the application of another state’s law that interferes with a person’s right to receive
 care that would be lawful if provided in this state.

(2) The manufacture, transport, distribution, delivery, receipt, acquisition, sale, possession, furnishment, dispensation, repackaging, or storage of brand name or generic mifepristone or any drug used for medication abortion that is lawful under the laws of the state.

(c) This section does not apply to a civil judgment, a criminal conviction, or a disciplinary action imposed in another state based upon conduct that would subject a provider to claim, charge, or action under the laws of this state.

(d) The commissioner may enforce this section pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division
 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision does not impair or restrict the commissioner’s enforcement authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 20.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.65.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Providers’ Bill of Rights.

(b) No contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2003, between a health insurer and a health care provider for the provision of covered benefits at alternative rates of payment to an insured shall contain any of the following terms:

(1) A provision that requires a health care provider to accept additional patients beyond the contracted number or in the absence of a number if, in the reasonable professional judgment of the provider, accepting additional patients would endanger patients’ access to, or
 continuity of, care.

(2) A requirement to comply with quality improvement or utilization management programs or procedures of a health insurer, unless the requirement is fully disclosed to the health care provider at least 15 business days prior to the provider executing the contract. However, the health insurer may make a change to the quality improvement or utilization management programs or procedures at any time if the change is necessary to comply with state or federal law or regulations or any accreditation requirements of a private sector accreditation organization. A change to the quality improvement or utilization management programs or procedures shall be made pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) A provision that waives or conflicts with any provision of the Insurance Code.

(4) A requirement to permit access to
 patient information in violation of federal or state laws concerning the confidentiality of patient information.

(c) If a contract is with a health insurer that negotiates and arranges for alternative rates of payment with the provider to provide benefits to insureds, the contract may contain provisions permitting a material change to the contract by the health insurer if the health insurer provides at least 45 business days’ notice to the provider of the change, and the provider has the right to terminate the contract prior to implementation of the change.

(d) With respect to a health insurance policy covering dental services or a specialized health insurance policy covering dental services, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If a material change is made to the health insurer’s rules, guidelines, policies, or
 procedures concerning dental provider contracting or coverage of or payment for dental services, the insurer shall provide at least 45 business days’ written notice to the dentists contracting with the health insurer to provide services under the insurer’s individual or group health insurance policies, including specialized health insurance policies. For purposes of this paragraph, written notice shall include notice by electronic mail or facsimile transmission. This paragraph shall apply in addition to the other applicable requirements imposed under this section.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a material change made to a health insurer’s rules, guidelines, policies, or procedures concerning dental provider contracting or coverage of or payment for dental services is a change to the system by which the insurer adjudicates and pays claims for treatment that may cause delays or disruptions in processing claims or making eligibility
 determinations, or a change to the general coverage or general policies of the insurer that affect rates and fees paid to providers.

(3) An insurer that automatically renews a contract with a dental provider shall annually make available to the provider, within 60 days following a request by the provider, either online, via email, or in paper form, a copy of its current contract and a summary of the changes described in subdivision (c) that have been made since the contract was issued or last renewed.

(e) Any contract provision that violates subdivision (b), (c), or (d) shall be void, unlawful, and unenforceable.

(f) The Department of Insurance shall annually compile all provider complaints that it receives under this section, and shall report to the Legislature and the Governor the number and nature of those
 complaints by March 15 of each calendar year.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed or applied as setting the rate of payment to be included in contracts between health insurers and health care providers.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Health care provider” means any professional person, medical group, independent practice association, organization, health facility, or other person or institution licensed or authorized by the state to deliver or furnish health care services.

(2) “Health insurer” means any admitted insurer writing health insurance, as defined in Section 106, that enters into a contract with a provider to provide covered benefits at alternative rates of payment.

(3) “Material” means a provision in a contract to which a reasonable person would attach importance in determining the action to be taken upon the provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 447, Sec. 2.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.66.

A health insurer shall comply with all the following:

 (a) Deadlines shall not be imposed for the receipt of a claim from a professional provider who submits a claim on behalf of an insured or pursuant to a professional provider’s contract with a health insurer that is less than 90 days for contracted providers and 180 days for noncontracted providers after the date of service, except as required by any state or federal law or regulation. If a health insurer is not the primary payor under coordination of benefits, the insurer shall not impose a deadline for submitting supplemental or coordination of benefits claims to any secondary payor that is less than 90 days from the date of payment or date of contest, denial, or notice from the primary payor. A health insurer that denies a claim because it was filed beyond the claim filing deadline shall, upon provider’s demonstration of good cause for the delay, accept and adjudicate the claim according to Section 10123.13 or 10123.147, whichever is applicable. This subdivision shall not alter or affect any rights providers may have under any applicable statute of limitations or antiforfeiture provisions available under the laws of the State of California.

(b) Reimbursement requests for the overpayment of a claim shall not be made, including requests made pursuant to Section 10123.145, unless a written request for reimbursement is sent to the provider within 365 days of the date of payment on the overpaid claim. The written notice shall clearly identify the claim, the name of the patient, and the date of service, and shall include a clear explanation of the basis upon which it is believed the amount paid on the claim was in excess of the amount due, including interest and penalties on the claim. The 365-day time limit shall not apply if the overpayment was caused in whole or in part by fraud or misrepresentation on the part of the provider.

 (c) The receipt of each claim shall be identified and acknowledged, whether or not complete, and the recorded date of receipt shall be disclosed in the same manner as the claim was submitted or provided through an electronic means, by telephone, Web site, or another mutually agreeable accessible method of notification, by which the provider may readily confirm the insurer’s receipt of the claim and the recorded date of receipt within 15 working days of the date of receipt of the claim by the office designated to receive the claim.

 If a claimant submits a claim to a health insurer using a claims clearinghouse, its identification and acknowledgment to the clearinghouse within the timeframes set forth above shall constitute compliance with this section.

 (d) Beginning July 1, 2006, prior to contracting, annually thereafter on or before the contract anniversary date, and in addition, upon the contracted provider’s written request, the health insurer shall disclose to contracting providers all of the following information in an electronic format:

(1) The amount of payment for each service to be provided under the contract, including any fee schedules or other factors or units used in determining the fees for each service. To the extent that reimbursement is made pursuant to a specified fee schedule, the contract shall incorporate that fee schedule by reference, including the year of the schedule. For any proprietary fee schedule, the contract shall include sufficient detail that payment amounts related to that fee schedule can be accurately predicted.

(2) The detailed payment policies and rules and nonstandard coding methodologies used to adjudicate claims, that shall, unless otherwise prohibited by state law do all of the following:

(A) When available, be consistent with Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), and standards accepted by nationally recognized medical societies and organizations, federal regulatory bodies, and major credentialing organizations.

(B) Clearly and accurately state what is covered by any global payment provisions for both professional and institutional services, any global payment provisions for all services necessary as part of a course of treatment in an institutional setting, and any other global arrangements such as per diem hospital payments.

(C) At a minimum, clearly and accurately state the policies regarding all of the following:

(i) Consolidation of multiple services or charges, and payment adjustments due to coding changes.

(ii) Reimbursement for multiple procedures.

(iii) Reimbursement for assistant surgeons.

(iv) Reimbursement for the administration of immunizations and injectable medications.

 (v) Recognition of CPT modifiers.

 The information disclosures required by this section shall be in sufficient detail and in an understandable format that does not disclose proprietary trade secret information or violate copyright law or patented processes, so that a reasonable person with sufficient training, experience, and competence in claims processing can determine the payment to be made according to the terms of the contract.

 A health insurer may disclose the fee schedules mandated by this section through the use of a Web site so long as it provides written notice to the contracted provider at least 45 days prior to implementing a Web site transmission format or posting any changes to the information on the Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 441, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.661.

On or before July 1, 2006, the commissioner, pursuant to his or her authority under Section 12921.1, shall also complete all of the following duties:

(a) Provide announcements that inform health insurance consumers and their health care providers of the department’s toll-free telephone number that is dedicated to the handling of complaints and of the availability of the Internet Web page established under this section, and the process to register a complaint with the department and to submit an inquiry to it.
